Louisiana, session 2026, HB948.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart C of Part V of Chapter 5-A of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1079.21 through 1079.25, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
SUBPART C. PARENTAL MEDICAL DECISION PROTECTION
§1079.21. Short title; purpose
A. This Subpart may be cited as the "Parental Medical Decision Protection
Act".
B. Parents and legal guardians possess a fundamental right to direct the
upbringing, healthcare, and medical treatment of their minor children.
C. Informed consent requires that medical decisions be voluntary and free
from coercion and with full disclosure of the risks and benefits of a medical
procedure.
§1079.22. Definitions
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1322 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 948
As used in this Subpart, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed
to them:
(1) "Chemotherapy" means the administration of chemical agents intended
to treat cancer.
(2) "Medical intervention" means any medical procedure, treatment, test,
drug, biological product, or therapy.
(3) "Parent or guardian" means a biological parent, adoptive parent, or legal
guardian with lawful authority over a minor child.
(4) "Non-emergency" means a condition that does not meet the definition of
a medical emergency including any condition that does not constitute an emergency
medical condition as defined in this Section.
(5) "Emergency medical condition" means a medical condition manifesting
itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity including severe pain such that the
absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in any
of the following:
(i) Placing the health of the individual or, with respect to a pregnant woman,
the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious jeopardy.
(ii) Serious impairment to bodily functions.
(iii) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.
§1079.23. Parental right to determine medical care; cancer treatment; prohibition on
certain investigations
A. No government entity, child welfare agency, law enforcement officer,
court, or healthcare facility shall initiate or pursue an investigation, petition, custody
action, neglect allegation, or any other adverse action against a parent or guardian
solely because the parent or guardian does any of the following:
(1) Declines chemotherapy or other cancer treatment for a minor.
(2) Seeks or obtains a second medical opinion regarding a diagnosis or
proposed treatment for a minor in a non-emergency situation.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1322 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 948
(3) Goes against medical advice or declines medical interventions or
therapies while pursuing other integrative or alternative treatment options for the
minor child.
B. A parent or guardian’s decision described in Subsection A of this Section
shall not constitute medical neglect or abuse under state law.
C. No healthcare provider shall be required to report a parent or guardian to
a government entity solely for making a decision described in Subsection A of this
Section.
§1079.24. Emergency medical care; exceptions
A. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to limit necessary intervention
when a minor is experiencing a life-threatening medical emergency requiring
immediate treatment. However, treatment in this instance shall be limited to treating
the life-threatening medical emergency.
B. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Require any parent or guardian to decline medical treatment.
(2) Prohibit any parent or guardian from consenting to chemotherapy or
other cancer treatment.
(3) Interfere with voluntary medical care chosen by the parent or guardian.
§1079.25. Enforcement; remedies
A. A parent or guardian aggrieved by a violation of this Subpart may bring
a civil action for declaratory relief, injunctive relief, actual damages, and reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.
B. Sovereign or governmental immunity is waived to the extent of liability
under this Section.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1322 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 948